Utah statutes.
39-6-69.   Attempt.

(1)  An act, done with specific intent to commit an offense under this chapter, amounting to more than mere preparation and tending, even though failing to effect its commission, is an attempt to commit that offense.

(2)  A person subject to this chapter who attempts to commit any offense punishable by this chapter shall be punished as a military court may direct, unless otherwise specifically prescribed in this chapter.

(3)  A person subject to this chapter may be convicted of an attempt to commit an offense although it appears from evidence presented at the court martial that the offense was not completed.

